Florida, session 2026, HB133.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (13) of section 790.065, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
790.065 Sale and delivery of firearms.—
(13) A person younger than 18 21 years of age may not
purchase a firearm. The sale or transfer of a firearm to a
person younger than 18 21 years of age may not be made or
facilitated by a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer, or
licensed dealer. A person who violates this subsection commits a
felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s.
775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. The prohibitions of this
subsection do not apply to the purchase of a rifle or shotgun by
a law enforcement officer or correctional officer, as those
terms are defined in s. 943.10(1), (2), (3), (6), (7), (8), or
(9), or a servicemember as defined in s. 250.01.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb133-00